Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-223
County fair; bonds; special tax.

In any county accepting the provisions of sections 2-221 to 2-231, an elected county fair board or the county board for an appointed county fair board may propose the issuance of bonds or levy a special tax for the purchase and improvement of real estate for county fair purposes in like manner as for the building of a courthouse.

Laws 1917, c. 168, § 4, p. 378;

C.S.1922, § 60;

C.S.1929, § 2-213;

R.S.1943, § 2-223;

Laws 1999, LB 437, § 4.

Issuance of courthouse bonds, see section 23-120.

Levy of special tax under this section cannot be made where county is not authorized to carry on a county fair. Richardson v. Kildow, 116 Neb. 648, 218 N.W. 429 (1928).